Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5112SV (2) 91 as/js S.F. 2283 Section 1. Section 321.492B, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 321.492B Use of unmanned aerial vehicle for traffic law 3 enforcement prohibited. 4 1. The Except as provided in subsection 2, the state or a 5 political subdivision of the state shall not use an unmanned 6 aerial vehicle for traffic law enforcement. 7 2. A certified law enforcement officer, meeting the 8 requirements of subsection 3, may operate an unmanned aerial 9 vehicle in order to assist other law enforcement officers in 10 apprehending a driver eluding or attempting to elude a pursuing 11 law enforcement vehicle in violation of section 321.279, and 12 may cite the driver for any traffic violations committed during 13 the pursuit. 14 3. An operator of an unmanned aerial vehicle shall be 15 certified under 14 C.F.R. pt. 107 or have a federal aviation 16 administration certificate of authorization or other applicable 17 federal certification or license. The unmanned aerial vehicle 18 shall be registered with the federal aviation administration, 19 and shall not enter controlled airspace or runway flight 20 paths. Unmanned aerial vehicle operators shall adhere to 21 applicable notices to airmen. An unmanned aerial vehicle 22 operator who enters a controlled airspace or runway flight 23 path, or who fails to adhere to applicable notices to airmen, 24 assumes liability for any damages that occur as a result of the 25 noncompliance. 26 Sec. 2. Section 808.15, Code 2026, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 808.15 Unmanned aerial vehicle ââ information ââ 29 admissibility. 30 1. Information Except as provided in subsection 2, 31 information obtained as a result of the use of an unmanned 32 aerial vehicle is not admissible as evidence in a criminal or 33 civil proceeding, unless the information is obtained pursuant 34 to the authority of a search warrant, or unless the information 35 -1- LSB 5112SV (2) 91 as/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2283 is otherwise obtained in a manner that is consistent with state 1 and federal law. 2 2. Information obtained by a certified law enforcement 3 officer operating an unmanned aerial vehicle in compliance 4 with section 321.492B while assisting in the apprehension of 5 a person who is eluding or attempting to elude a pursuing 6 law enforcement vehicle, in violation of section 321.279, is 7 admissible in a criminal prosecution of the person eluding or 8 attempting to elude law enforcement. 9